Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2619.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary The Foundation Budget
Review Commission prescribed by Ch. 70, S. 4 of the General Laws shall convene not later than
January 2, 2026, provided that, in addition to the review of the items identified in said section,
the commission shall also consider the challenges presented for school districts with declining
enrollment, the increased costs associated with social-emotional learning and mental health, the
costs associated with special education, and the methodology employed to calculate required
local contribution by municipalities, provided further that, in establishing the scope of its
operations, the commission shall conduct no less than 3 public hearings in geographically diverse
locations in the commonwealth, which shall accommodate remote electronic participation. The
commission shall file a final report, including legislative recommendations, no later than
September 30, 2026, with the clerks of the House and Senate, the House and Senate Committees
on Ways and Means, the Joint Committee on Education, the Department of Elementary and
of 2

Secondary Education, and the Executive Office of Education provided that the commission may
file interim reports from time to time in the same manner.
of 2